Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2503
Payment or delivery discharges.

Payment or delivery made in good faith on the basis of the proof of authority and affidavit releases the debtor or person having possession of the personal property to the same extent as if payment or delivery had been made to a local personal representative.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 209, UPC § 4-202.